Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2440
Agency; power to tax denied; general powers and duties.

An agency established pursuant to sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 shall constitute a political subdivision and a public body corporate and politic of this state exercising public powers separate from the participating municipalities. An agency shall have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a political subdivision and a public body corporate and politic, but shall not have taxing power. An agency shall have power (1) to sue and be sued, (2) to have a seal and alter the same at pleasure, or to dispense with the necessity thereof, (3) to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers, and (4) from time to time, to make, amend, and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations not inconsistent with sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 to carry out and effectuate its powers and purposes.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 40.